Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.186

Fixed load vehicle.

"Fixed load vehicle" means a commercial vehicle that has a structure or machinery permanently attached such as, but not limited to, an air compressor, a bunk house, a conveyor, a cook house, a donkey engine, a hoist, a rock crusher, a tool house, or a well drilling machine. Fixed load vehicles are not capable of carrying any additional load other than the structure or machinery permanently attached.

[ 2010 c 161 s 116.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.